Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.900.105

Effect of repeal—1995 c 335.

The repeal of any programs that are not funded as of July 23, 1995, is not intended to comment on the value of the services provided by the programs. The repeal of statutes in chapter 335, Laws of 1995 does not affect the general authority of school districts to provide services to accomplish the purposes of these programs. The deletion or repeal of language that permitted school districts to carry out specific activities that would be within their general authority is not intended to affect the general authority of school districts to continue to carry out those activities.

[ 1995 c 335 s 801.]

NOTES:

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: See note following RCW 28A.150.360.